Louisiana, session 2026, HB840.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1105(B), (C), and (D) and 1107(A)(1), (B)(introductory
paragraph), and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 30:1105(E) is hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1105. Hearings; notice; public records
* * *
B.(1) In addition to the requirements contained in Subsection A of this
Section, no order, permit, or certificate shall be issued by the secretary under this
Chapter without first providing notice to the governing authority of any parish
affected and a public hearing is conducted to receive public comments. Notice may
be made by electronic mail to the parish president, police jury president, or
mayor-president, depending on the form of parish government.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-514 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 840
(2) A hearing to receive public comment shall be held in every parish in
which a pipeline for the transport of carbon dioxide is to be constructed.
B. C. All rules, regulations, and orders made by the commissioner secretary
under this Chapter shall be in writing and shall be entered in full by him in a book
kept for that purpose. This book shall be a public record and shall be open for
inspection at all times during reasonable office hours and shall be available on the
Department of Conservation and Energy website. A copy of a rule, regulation, or
order certified by the commissioner secretary shall be received in evidence in all
courts of this state with the same effect as the original.
C. D. Any interested person has the right to have the commissioner secretary
call a hearing for the purpose of taking action in respect to a matter within the
jurisdiction of the commissioner secretary as provided in this Section Chapter by
making a request therefor in writing and paying the hearing fee set by the
commissioner secretary, as provided by law for a hearing conducted pursuant to R.S.
30:6. Upon receiving the request and payment of the required fees the commissioner
secretary shall promptly call a hearing. After the hearing and with all convenient
speed and within thirty days after the conclusion of the hearing, the commissioner
secretary shall take whatever action he deems appropriate with regard to the subject
matter.
D. E. The commissioner secretary shall give substantial consideration to
local government comments, oral or written, when determining the appropriate
course of action to take in any matter requiring a public comment period or public
hearing pursuant to this Chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this Chapter.
* * *
§1107. Certificates of public convenience and necessity; certificate of completion
of injection operations
A.(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate of public convenience and
necessity or a certificate of completion of injection operations to each person
applying therefor if, after notice is given and a public hearing is held pursuant to the
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-514 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 840
provisions of R.S. 30:6 R.S. 30:1105 held in the parish where the storage facility is
to be located, the secretary determines that it is required by the present or future
public convenience and necessity, and such decision is based upon the following
criteria:
* * *
B. The secretary may issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity
to a transporter of carbon dioxide applying therefor, whether or not such transporter
is also the storage operator, for the laying, maintaining, and operating of a pipeline
for the transportation of carbon dioxide to a storage facility, and such rights
necessary and incidental thereto if, after notice and opportunity for a public hearing
pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 30:6 R.S. 30:1105, the secretary determines that
it is or will be in the present or future public interest to do so and finds one of the
following:
* * *
D. The secretary shall issue a certificate of completion of injection
operations to the operator applying therefor if, after notice and opportunity for a
public hearing pursuant to R.S. 30:6 R.S. 30:1105, it is determined that such operator
has met all of the conditions required for such certificate, including the requirements
of R.S. 30:1109.
* * *